Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1563.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-507, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-507. Fees A. The board shall establish and collect fees not to exceed the following: 1. Application for initial personal license, a onetime fee of $100 $80. 2. Application for personal reciprocity or universal license, a onetime fee of $200 $100. 3. Application for establishment license, including change of name, change of ownership and change of location, $250 $200. 4. Application for school license and initial inspection fee, including change of name, change of ownership and change of location, $1,000. 5. Application for certification of licensure or hours, $30. 6. Personal license renewal, $100 $80 to be paid once every two years pursuant to section 32-517 or 32-535. 7. Personal license delinquent renewal, $150 $100. 8. Establishment license after a change of location, $150. 9. 8. Establishment license renewal, $100 $80. 10. 9. Establishment license delinquent renewal, $150 $100. 11. 10. School license renewal, $500 $400. 12. 11. School license delinquent renewal, $600 $500. 13. 12. Delinquent penalties for each year or portion of a year for which the license was inactive expired. 14. 13. Computer printouts of names of licensees, up to $.10 per name. 15. 14. Duplicate license, $30. 16. 15. Dishonored checks, $20. 17. 16. Copying charges, $1 per page. For audiotapes, videotapes, computer discs or other mediums used for recording sounds, images or information, $15 per tape, disc or other medium. 18. 17. Board-administered educational classes, $100 $75. 19. 18. Service charges for persons who pay with alternative payment methods, including credit cards, charge cards, debit cards and electronic transfers, not to exceed the cost of the alternative payment method. 20. 19. Eyelash technician registration, an amount to be determined by the board. 21. 20. Eyelash technician registration renewal, an amount to be determined by the board. 22. 21. Eyelash technician registration delinquent renewal, an amount to be determined by the board. B. The board may charge additional fees for: 1. Documents and publications provided by the board. 2. Services that the board deems appropriate to carry out its intent and purpose. These additional fees shall not exceed the costs of rendering the services.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Repeal Section 32-512.02, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 3. Title 32, chapter 5, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section 32-512.02, to read: START_STATUTE32-512.02. Barbers; licensure; applications; qualifications a. A person is entitled to receive a barber license if the person does all of the following: 1. Submits to the BOARD an application for a barber license on a form supplied by the board. 2. Either: (a) Submits satisfactory evidence that the person is at least sixteen years old and has completed and received appropriate credits for at least two years of high school education or its equivalent as prescribed in rules adopted by the board. (b) Submits to the board satisfactory evidence that the person is at least eighteen years of age. 3. Submits to the board satisfactory evidence that the person meets any of the following: (a) Graduated from a barbering school in another state or country that had substantially the same requirements for schools licensed by the board at the time of the person's graduation. (b) Completed a barbering course consisting of at least one thousand two hundred hours of training in a school licensed by the board. (c) completed a united states department of labor-approved or a department of economic security-approved apprenticeship program in barbering that includes at least two hundred fifty hours of infection protection law review instruction. The person shall complete the instruction required by this subdivision through either: (i) a school that is licensed by the board or a school or program in another state that has, in the board's opinion, licensure requirements that are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state. (ii) a department of economic security-approved apprenticeship program. 4. Pays the prescribed fees for a barber license. 5. Passes the examinations for a barber license. b. Notwithstanding subsection a, paragraphs 2 and 3 of this section, an applicant for a barber license who holds a cosmetologist license or a hairstylist license issued pursuant to this chapter shall complete a two hundred-hour course consisting of barbering techniques in a school licensed by the board.END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Repeal Section 41-3026.06, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 5. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.06, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.06. Barbering and cosmetology board; termination July 1, 2034 A. The barbering and cosmetology board terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 32, chapter 5 and this section are repealed on JANUARY 1, 2035. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the barbering and cosmetology board to ensure the public is protected from the incompetent practice of barbering and cosmetology by establishing minimum qualifications for entry into these professions and swift and effective discipline for those practitioners who violate barbering or cosmetology statutes or rules adopted pursuant to those statutes. Sec. 7. Retroactivity Sections 4 and 5 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.